Wisconsin, session 2025, SB638.
do enact as follows:SB638,11Section 1. 66.0501 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB638,2,10266.0501 (4) (a) A volunteer fire fighter, emergency medical services 3practitioner, or emergency medical responder in a city, village, or town whose 4annual compensation from one or more of those positions, including fringe benefits, 5does not exceed $25,000 $35,000 if the city, village, or town has a population of 65,000 or less, or $15,000 $25,000 if the city, village, or town has a population of more 7than 5,000, may also hold an elective office in that city, village, or town. It is 8compatible with his or her office for an elected village or town officer to receive 9wages under s. 60.37 (4) or 61.327 for work that he or she performs for the village or 10town.SB638,2,1111